Nebraska, session 109, LB275.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 43-907, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
43-907 (1) Unless a guardian shall have been appointed by a court of
competent jurisdiction, the Department of Health and Human Services shall take
custody of, and exercise general control over, assets owned by children under
the charge of the department.
(2) Except as provided in subsections (3) through (7) of this section:
(a) Children owning assets shall at all times pay for personal items; .
(b) Assets over and above a maximum of one thousand dollars and current
income shall be available for reimbursement to the state for the cost of
care; .
(c) Assets may be deposited in a checking account, invested in United
States bonds, or deposited in a savings account insured by the United States
Government; .
(d) All income received from the investment or deposit of assets shall be
credited to the individual child whose assets are were invested or deposited;
and .
(e) The department shall make and maintain detailed records showing all
receipts, investments, and expenditures of assets owned by children under the
charge of the department.
(3)(a) The department shall screen each child under its charge for social
security benefit eligibility within sixty days after the date the child enters
its charge.
(b)(i) If the department determines that a child may be eligible for
social security benefits, it shall submit an application for such benefits on
behalf of the child and, if necessary and in the child's best interest, appeal
a denied application.
(ii) The department shall provide written notice to the child, using age-
appropriate language, the child's guardian ad litem, and the child's parents,
of all benefit eligibility determinations from the Social Security
Administration, including benefit approval, denial, and appeal outcomes, within
ten calendar days after the date the department is notified of such eligibility
determination.
(iii) If the child is approved to receive social security benefits, within
ten calendar days after the date the department is notified of the approval,
the department shall provide written notice to the child, using age-appropriate
language, the child's guardian ad litem, and the child's parents, that adults
known to the child may apply to be the child's representative payee for the
purposes of receiving social security benefit payments.
(iv) If the department is appointed to serve as the child's representative
payee, within ten calendar days after the date the department is notified of
such appointment, the department shall provide written notice to the child,
using age-appropriate language, the child's guardian ad litem, and the child's
parents, of such appointment, the child's and the child's parents' rights to
appeal the appointment, and the deadline for such appeals.
(4) (2) When the Department of Health and Human Services serves as
representative payee for a child beneficiary of social security benefits, the
department shall provide:
(a) Written notice Notice to the child beneficiary, using in an age-
appropriate language manner, and the child's guardian ad litem, and the child's
parents that the department is acting as the child's representative payee for
the purposes of receiving social security benefit payments benefits, within
thirty days after receiving the first social security benefit payment on behalf
of the child beneficiary. The notice shall include the following information: ;
(i) The department received the social security benefit payment and the
amount received;
(ii) The department has created a trust account to hold such benefit
payments;
(iii) Such benefit payments shall be used and conserved in accordance with
federal law and this section, and any unspent or conserved funds shall be sent
to the child beneficiary when the child beneficiary leaves the department's
charge;
(iv) The child beneficiary may request access to such benefit payments for
personal use through the department and the process for submitting such a
request;
-1-

LB275 LB275
2025 2025
(v) A child beneficiary fourteen years of age or older may request through
the juvenile court that such benefit payments be used or conserved in a
specified manner; and
(vi) The child beneficiary, the child's guardian ad litem, the child's
attorney, or the child's parents may request all accounting records the
department maintains relating to the child beneficiary's social security
benefit payments and the process for submitting such a request;
(b) Written notice Notice to the juvenile court, at each every review
hearing for regarding the child beneficiary after January 1, 2023, regarding
the department's receipt and conservation of the child's social security
benefits, which that shall include:
(i) The total amount of social security benefit payment funds the
department has received on behalf of the child beneficiary as of the date of
the review hearing; and
(ii) The total amount of social security benefit payment funds received on
behalf of the child beneficiary that are currently conserved or unspent as of
the date of the review hearing; and
(iii) The total amount of social security benefit payment funds spent on
behalf of the child beneficiary as of the date of the review hearing, including
itemized expenditures since the previous review hearing; and
(c) All accounting records regarding the department's receipt, use, and
conservation of the child's social security benefit payments benefits, to the
child beneficiary, the child's guardian ad litem or attorney, or the child's
parent upon:
(i) Request by from the child beneficiary, the child's guardian ad litem
or attorney, or the child's parent; and
(ii) Termination of the department's role as the child beneficiary's
representative payee.
(5) When the department serves as representative payee for a child
beneficiary of social security benefit payments, it shall:
(a) Manage, use, and conserve the social security benefit payments
consistent with federal law and this section, for the use and benefit of the
child beneficiary, and in the child beneficiary's best interest. This includes
conserving social security benefit payments for the child beneficiary's
reasonably foreseeable and if appropriate, expressed, future needs;
(b) Hold all social security benefit payments received on behalf of a
child beneficiary separate and apart from the department's funds, and except as
provided in subdivision (5)(c) of this section, in a trust account established
and maintained for the child beneficiary;
(c) Manage such benefit payments in a manner that avoids exceeding the
federal social security asset and resource limits, including holding benefit
payments in the established trust account and in accounts and programs not
counted toward such limits, so as to conserve funds without exceeding such
limits. Such accounts and programs include, but are not limited to, (i) a plan
for achieving self-support as described in section 68-1007, (ii) an achieving a
better life experience account as described in sections 77-1401 to 77-1409,
(iii) an individual development account as described in 45 C.F.R. 263.20, (iv)
a special-needs trust as defined in section 30-4513, and (v) a dedicated
account for social security back payments;
(d) Conserve a minimum amount of social security benefit payments received
on behalf of a child beneficiary, which shall not be used to reimburse the
state for the cost of care, in the following percentages: (i) For child
beneficiaries fourteen years of age or older, no less than twenty percent; (ii)
for child beneficiaries sixteen years of age or older, no less than thirty
percent; (iii) for child beneficiaries seventeen years of age or older, no less
than forty percent; and (iv) for child beneficiaries eighteen years of age or
older, fifty percent; and
(e) Reimburse such funds with subsequent social security benefit payments
and such payments shall not be available to reimburse the department for the
child beneficiary's care if, pursuant to a request by the child beneficiary,
funds from social security payments are disbursed from an established trust
account or any other account or program maintained by the department for the
child beneficiary.
(6) If the department serves as representative payee for a child
beneficiary of social security benefits fourteen years of age or older, such
child beneficiary shall:
(a) Be consulted by the department no less than every six months regarding
the child beneficiary's current and reasonably foreseeable future needs so that
the child beneficiary's social security benefit payments are spent and
conserved in a manner that supports the child beneficiary's needs and best
interests;
(b) Have the right to request through the juvenile court, that the child
beneficiary's social security benefit payments be used or conserved for current
or reasonably foreseeable future needs in a manner that is different from the
department's use and conservation of such payments. Such request shall be
granted if it is determined to be in the best interest of the child
beneficiary;
(c) Be informed in writing, at least six months prior to exiting the
department's charge, of the process for continuing to receive social security
benefit payments, the applicable federal asset and resource limits, and the
process for using and conserving benefit payments to comply with such limits,
including funds in accounts and programs that do not count toward such limits;
and
-2-

LB275 LB275
2025 2025
(d) At least six months prior to exiting the department's charge, have an
application submitted on behalf of the child beneficiary, or receive assistance
in submitting an application, for renewed or new social security benefits for
which the child beneficiary may be eligible if necessary for the child
beneficiary to continue receiving benefits.
(7) When a child beneficiary exits the department's charge, the department
shall provide written notice to such child beneficiary using age-appropriate
language, and if applicable, the child's parents or guardians, that:
(a) The child beneficiary has the right to receive unspent or conserved
social security benefit payments, the amount of unspent or conserved benefits
the child beneficiary is expected to receive, that such payments will be
disbursed from the Social Security Administration, and contact information for
the Social Security Administration; and
(b) The department is no longer acting as the child beneficiary's
representative payee and if the child beneficiary is younger than eighteen
years of age, an adult known to the child may apply to be a representative
payee through the Social Security Administration to ensure continued receipt of
the child's social security benefit payments.
(8) On or before October 1, 2026, the department shall create a publicly
available form for child beneficiaries under the department's charge to request
access to social security benefit payments for personal use.
(9) (3) On or before October 1, 2026 2023, the Department of Health and
Human Services shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out
subsections (2) through (8) subsection (2) of this section consistent with
federal requirements regarding representative payees for social security
beneficiaries.
(10) The department shall seek to maximize federal Title IV-E funding
prior to utilizing General Funds for costs associated with implementation of
this section.
Sec. 2. Original section 43-907, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is repealed.
-3-